Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Anhydrous Ammonia

43-11-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Anhydrous Ammonia Storage and Equipment Law of Tennessee.”

Acts 1949, ch. 198, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 519.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1301, 43-13-101.

Cross-References. Lien for farm implements and supplies, § 66-12-103.

Soil conservation, title 43, ch. 14.

43-11-302. Powers and duties of commissioner — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture is vested with the power and authority and is charged with the duty of administering and enforcing this part, and has the authority to establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this part, for the purpose of carrying out this part.

Acts 1949, ch. 198, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 519.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1302, 43-13-102.

43-11-303. Part definitions.

“Anhydrous ammonia,” when used exclusively for commercial fertilizer, is, for the purpose of this part, defined as follows: anhydrous ammonia contains eighty-two percent (82%) nitrogen. At atmospheric pressure, ammonia is a gas that exists as a liquid below minus twenty-eight degrees Fahrenheit (-28° F.), and boils at this temperature. In commerce, ammonia is compressed to a liquid and stored under pressure. The gauge pressure is seventy-five pounds (75 lbs.) per square inch at fifty degrees Fahrenheit (50° F.), and one hundred ninety-seven pounds (197 lbs.) per square inch at one hundred degrees Fahrenheit (100° F.). The pressures exerted by anhydrous ammonia are dangerous unless the proper safety devices are installed in the equipment and care is used in handling.

“Dealers in anhydrous ammonia and equipment,” as covered by this part, are all persons, firms, corporations or associations who buy and sell or distribute at wholesale or retail to users and consumers, anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer, or equipment used in the installation, storage, handling, utilization and dispensing of anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer. Manufacturers of anhydrous ammonia, or manufacturers or jobbers that wholesale anhydrous ammonia equipment, when sold to dealers or distributors, as defined in this part, or any person or persons, firms or corporations owning or maintaining storage facilities for anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer for their own use and accommodation, and for the use and accommodation of their tenant or sharecropper, are not to be classed as dealers within the meaning and intention of this part.

Acts 1949, ch. 198, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 519.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1303, 43-13-103.

43-11-304. Dealers' permit necessary before doing business — Bond for compliance with provisions — Financial responsibility.

No person, firm, corporation or association shall engage in business as a dealer in anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer, or as a dealer in equipment used in the handling of anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer within this state without first having obtained from the commissioner of agriculture a permit. This permit shall be issued only after proper written application is made and filed and after all requirements established with respect to dealers have been complied with by the applicant.

Before engaging in business as a dealer, the applicant for a permit shall furnish a bond for the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) with good and solvent surety, payable to the state of Tennessee, and issued by a bonding company or companies licensed to do business in this state and acceptable by the commissioner, which bond shall serve as a guarantee that the dealer will comply with all the provisions of this part and all of the rules and regulations established with respect to the sale and handling of anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer, and the sale and handling or installation of equipment used in the handling of anhydrous ammonia as a fertilizer.

Before engaging in business as a dealer, the applicant for a permit shall satisfy the commissioner that the applicant is financially responsible; and this provision as to financial responsibilities will be complied with by filing with the commissioner evidence that the applicant has applied for and the applicant's application for insurance has been approved, on standard contract forms, and to be issued by insurance company or companies licensed to do business in this state in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

In lieu of filing with the commissioner evidence of insurance coverages as set forth in subsection (c), the applicant may file with the commissioner a good and sufficient surety bond executed by a surety company licensed to do business in the state of Tennessee, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), which bond shall be payable to the state of Tennessee and shall be conditioned to guarantee the payment of all damages for which the dealer may be legally responsible while engaged in the business as a dealer.

Acts 1949, ch. 198, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 519.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1304, 43-13-104.

43-11-305. Punishment of violations.

A violation of this part or rules and regulations promulgated under this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1949, ch. 198, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 519.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1305, 43-13-105; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.